Utah statutes.
35A-8-722.   Act not restriction on powers of corporation -- Construed as alternative -- Bonds, notes, obligations issued need not comply with other laws.

(1) (a)  This part and its contents are not a restriction or limitation upon other powers that the corporation has under other laws of this state.

(b)  This part is cumulative to the powers referenced in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  This part provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for doing the things authorized in this part and is supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

(3)  The issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations under this part need not comply with the requirements of any other state law applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations.

(4)  Proceedings, notice, or approval are not required for the issuance of any bonds, notes, and other obligations or any instrument as security for them, except as provided in this part.

